test/src/morphology/adj-3.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives with -is attribut. Adjectives that belong to ÁRMMOGIS,LÅSSÅT, SUOHKAT, TJUODDJE, TJALMEDIBME,BASSTEL, DABÁR, ÁRMMOGIS, UDNODIBME

Tests:

  Adjective - låssåt: # LÅSSÅT
    låssåt+A+Attr: [låssis,låsså]
    låssåt+A+Sg+Nom: låssåt
    låssåt+A+Sg+Gen: låssåda
    låssåt+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [låsep, låssådabbo]
    låssåt+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [låsemus, låssådamos]

  Adjective - suohkat: # SUOHKAT
    suohkat+A+Attr: suohkkis
    suohkat+A+Sg+Nom: suohkat 
    suohkat+A+Sg+Acc: suohkadav 
    suohkat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: suohkadabbo
    suohkat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: suohkadamos

  Adjective - njárbbat: # SUOHKAT
    njárbbat+A+Attr: njárbbis 
    njárbbat+A+Sg+Nom: njárbbat 
    njárbbat+A+Sg+Ine: njárbbadin
    njárbbat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: njárbbadabbo
    njárbbat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: njárbbadamos

  Adjective - tjuoddje: # TJUODDJE
    tjuoddje+A+Attr: tjuoddjis 
    tjuoddje+A+Sg+Nom: tjuoddje 
    tjuoddje+A+Sg+Ela: tjuoddjes 
    tjuoddje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjuoddjep
    tjuoddje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjuoddjemus


  Adjective - tjuovgadibme: #  TJALMEDIBME
    tjuovgadibme+A+Attr: tjuovgadis
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Nom: tjuovgadibme
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Gen: tjuovgadime
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Acc: tjuovgadimev
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Ill: tjuovgadibmáj
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Ine: tjuovgadimen
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Ela: tjuovgadimes
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Com: tjuovgadimijn
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Nom: tjuovgadime
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Gen: tjuovgadimij
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Acc: tjuovgadimijt
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Ill: tjuovgadimijda
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Ine: tjuovgadimijn
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Ela: tjuovgadimijs
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Com: tjuovgadimij
    tjuovgadibme+A+Ess: tjuovgadibmen
    tjuovgadibme+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: 
    tjuovgadibme+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: 

  Adjective - udnodibme: # UDNODIBME
    udnodibme+A+Attr: udnodis 
    udnodibme+A+Sg+Nom: udnodibme 
    udnodibme+A+Sg+Com: udnodimijn 
    udnodibme+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: udnodabbo
    udnodibme+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: udnodamos

  Adjective - vigák: # BASSTEL
    vigák+A+Attr: vigágis 
    vigák+A+Sg+Nom: vigák 
    vigák+A+Sg+Com: vigágijn 
    vigák+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vigágabbo
    vigák+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vigágamos

  Adjective - dabár: # DABÁR
    dabár+A+Attr: dabáris 
    dabár+A+Sg+Nom: dabár 
    dabár+A+Sg+Gen: dahpara 
    dabár+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: dahparabbo
    dabár+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dahparamos

  Adjective - fábmogis: # ÁRMMOGIS
    fábmogis+A+Attr: fábmogis 
    fábmogis+A+Sg+Nom: fábmogis 
    fábmogis+A+Sg+Acc: fábmogisáv 
    fábmogis+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: fábmogabbo
    fábmogis+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: fábmogamos
